Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1378
Cremation authorization form; signature.

(1) Any person signing a cremation authorization form shall be deemed to warrant the truthfulness of any facts set forth on such form, including the identity of the deceased whose remains are sought to be cremated and the authority of the person to authorize such cremation. Any person signing a cremation authorization form is personally liable for all damages resulting from false, incorrect, or misleading information contained on such form.

(2) A crematory authority may cremate human remains upon the receipt of a cremation authorization form signed by an authorizing agent and a completed and executed permit for transit or cremation or cremation permit as required by law.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 24.